Illinois, session 104th, HB3112.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Owned By Noncitizens Act is 5amended by changing Section 7 and by adding Section 7.5 as 6follows: 7    (765 ILCS 60/7)  (from Ch. 6, par. 7)8    Sec. 7. Except as provided in Section 7.5, all All 9noncitizens may acquire, hold, and dispose of real and 10personal property in the same manner and to the same extent as 11natural born citizens of the United States, and the personal 12estate of a noncitizen dying intestate shall be distributed in 13the same manner as the estates of natural born citizens, and 14all persons interested in such estate shall be entitled to 15proper distributive shares thereof under the laws of this 16state, whether they are noncitizens or not.17    This amendatory Act of 1992 does not apply to the 18Agricultural Foreign Investment Disclosure Act.19(Source: P.A. 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22.) 20    (765 ILCS 60/7.5 new)21    Sec. 7.5. Prohibition on purchase of public or private 22real estate by noncitizens.  HB3112- 2 -LRB104 10033 JRC 20104 b1    (a) Notwithstanding Section 7 or any other provision of 2law, beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 3the 104th General Assembly, the Governor shall take such 4actions as may be necessary to prohibit the purchase of public 5or private real estate by noncitizens. As used in this 6Section, "noncitizen" means: (i) any foreign national, foreign 7government, or foreign entity; or (ii) any entity over which 8control is exercised or exercisable by a foreign national, 9foreign government, or foreign entity. "noncitizen" also 10includes a corporation, partnership, or other association: (i) 11created under the laws of a foreign country; and (ii) 12substantially beneficially owned by nationals of that foreign 13country or any other foreign country.14    (b) Within 6 months after the effective date of this 15amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Commission 16on Government Forecasting and Accountability shall submit to 17the General Assembly a report that:18        (1) details the history of purchases of public and 19    private real estate located in the State by noncitizens;20        (2) provides more information on the percentage of 21    real estate located in the State that is owned by 22    noncitizens; and23        (3) offers recommendations to make it easier for 24    citizens and harder for noncitizens to purchase real 25    estate located in the State, including farmland.26    (c) This Section is repealed 5 years after the effective   HB3112- 3 -LRB104 10033 JRC 20104 b1date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.